main.foma
define V [a | e | i | o | u ];
define C [b | t | d | r];

read lexc nouns.lexc
define Lexicon;

define IInsertion [..] -> i || C _ "^" [m|n g];
define SInsertion [..] -> s || V _ "^" i;
define LarDeletion l a r -> 0 || _ "^" [l a r];


define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. LarDeletion .o. SInsertion .o. IInsertion .o. Cleanup;
